Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-20] Sham mixed martial arts contest;
penalty against contestant. The license of any mixed martial arts contestant
who knowingly participates in any sham or false mixed martial arts contest
shall be automatically suspended and the mixed martial arts contestant shall be
suspended from further participation in any contest held or given under this
chapter for not less than twelve months from the date of the offense and may be
permanently disqualified from further participation in any contest held or given
under this chapter. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next